Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 2. Magistrates of the Circuit Court

Repeals and recreations. —

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1, repealed and recreated former

5-9-201

through

5-9-210

, relating to circuit court magistrates, as present §§

5-9-201

through

5-9-213

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, effective July 1, 2000, initially created an article 2 in this chapter relating to magistrates of circuit courts by significantly renumbering and amending provisions in former article 1 of the chapter and additionally enacting a new section. For the disposition of Laws 2000, ch. 24, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Applicability. —

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 3, provides that the act applies to all magistrates serving on the effective date of the act.

§ 5-9-201.
Qualifications
for magistrates.

A full-time magistrate of the circuit court under W.S.

5-9-206

shall be a qualified elector and a resident of the county for which appointed.

A part-time magistrate of the circuit court under W.S.

5-9-210

shall be a qualified elector and a resident of the district within which the circuit court is located.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1; 2006, ch. 7, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added designation (a), and within (a), inserted “full-time” and added the section reference; and added (b).

Cited

in

MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 5-9-202.
Circuit court to enter order appointing magistrates.

The circuit court in
open court shall enter an order appointing each full-time magistrate
of the circuit court under W.S.

5-9-206

and each part-time magistrate of the circuit court under W.S.

5-9-210

and shall enter the order upon the journal. A certified
copy of the journal entry shall be evidence of the appointment in
all courts of this state.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 5-9-203.
Oath.

Magistrates of the circuit
court, before entering upon the discharge of their official duties,
shall take and subscribe before a circuit court judge or a clerk of
a court of record the oath of office prescribed by the constitution
of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

Cited in

Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 5-9-204.
Record of official actions.

Each magistrate of the
circuit court shall enter a record of his official actions in a journal
in the circuit court. The entries shall be signed by the magistrate.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 5-9-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011,
ch. 57, § 1.

Editor's Notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1, related to bond for circuit court magistrate.

Laws 2011, ch. 57, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 5-9-206.
Full-time magistrates; selection.

In every county receiving the services of a circuit court and wherein a circuit court judge does not reside, there may be one (1) full-time magistrate who shall meet the qualifications under W.S.

5-9-201

.

Upon determination by the supreme court after consultation with the appropriate board of county commissioners, that a full-time magistrate is necessary, all of the circuit judges whose circuit includes the county together shall agree upon a person to fill the office of a full-time magistrate under subsection (a) of this section. The name of the agreed upon person shall be submitted for approval or rejection to the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the full-time magistrate will serve. Upon approval by the board, the circuit court shall appoint the person as a magistrate as provided in W.S.

5-9-202

.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of a full-time magistrate, the supreme court shall determine whether a full-time magistrate shall be appointed. In making its determination, the supreme court shall take into account whether one (1) or more part-time magistrates will sufficiently meet the needs of the county. If the supreme court after consultation with the appropriate board of county commissioners, determines that a full-time magistrate shall not be appointed, one (1) or more part-time magistrates shall be appointed as provided in W.S.

5-9-210

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1; 2013 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2013, made a stylistic change in (a); added “Upon determination by the supreme court after consultation with the appropriate board of county commissioners, that a full-time magistrate is necessary,” “a full-time,” and “full-time” and made stylistic change in (b); and added (c).

§ 5-9-207.
Full-time magistrates; term of office; retention; removal.

The term of office of each full-time magistrate selected under W.S.

5-9-206

and appointed under W.S.

5-9-202

shall be four (4) years. The magistrate shall serve for one (1) year after that person’s appointment and until the first Monday in January following the next general election after the expiration of that year.

At the general election, the full-time magistrate shall stand for retention in office in the county wherein the magistrate was appointed. Irrespective of any vote of the electorate whereby the magistrate is retained in office, the circuit judges of the circuit by unanimous vote may remove the magistrate.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1; 2013 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

,
effective July 1, 2013, added “full-time” in (a) and (b).

§ 5-9-208.
Full-time
magistrates; powers of magistrates who are authorized to practice
law; powers of magistrates who are not authorized to practice law.

At the direction of the circuit judges of a circuit or the supreme court, a full-time magistrate of the circuit court who is authorized to practice law in Wyoming may perform all of the duties of a circuit court judge presiding in circuit court as authorized by law and rules. Upon direction, the magistrate shall have all of the powers of a circuit court judge presiding in circuit court as authorized by law and rules. A magistrate shall not preside in or hear or decide any district court proceeding or case in circuit court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-3-112

.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and upon request and consent of all parties to a proceeding or case in circuit court and subject to the approval of the circuit judge presiding in the proceeding or case, a full-time magistrate who is authorized to practice law in Wyoming may hear and determine any and all matters relating to the proceeding or case that are within the jurisdiction of the circuit court, except the magistrate shall not preside in or hear or decide any district court proceeding or case in circuit court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-3-112

.

At the direction of the circuit court judges of a circuit court, a full-time magistrate of the circuit court who is not authorized to practice law in Wyoming may within the county from which appointed:

Administer an oath or affirmation authorized or required by law to be administered;

Take acknowledgment of deeds, mortgages and other instruments in writing;

Perform marriage ceremonies;

Issue subpoenas for witnesses, and require their attendance in causes or matters pending before them, or other cause or matter wherein they may be required to take depositions;

Try the action for forcible entry and detainer, as set forth in W.S.

1-21-1001

through

1-21-1016

;

Proceed against sureties for costs and amount of bail, on the stay of execution on their dockets;

Issue attachments, executions and garnishments, and proceed against the goods and effects of debtors in certain cases, as provided by law;

Issue executions on judgments rendered by them;

Try the right of the claimant to property taken in execution, garnishment or on attachment;

Try all civil actions where the amount in controversy, exclusive of costs, does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00);

Try an action upon bonds, conditioned for the payment of money, where the amount claimed does not exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00), though the penalty exceeds that sum, the judgment to be given for the sum actually due;

Hear and determine an action brought upon any instrument payable in installments, as each installment becomes due, when such instrument and amounts shall be within the magistrate’s jurisdiction;

Enter the following judgments, when the amount does not exceed the magistrate’s jurisdiction:

Judgment by default;

Summary judgment;

Judgment on the pleadings;

Judgment on the confession of a party;

Set aside default judgments; and

Issue any order a circuit judge can enter in chambers.

Try an action for disposition of an abandoned vehicle as provided by W.S. 31-13-112(e), regardless of the value of the abandoned vehicle;

Issue warrants or summonses in criminal cases in accordance with the rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court. A warrant or summons issued by the magistrate charging any crime may be executed or served at any place within the state;

Set bail in criminal proceedings, including bail for witnesses, in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 5-9-132(a) and the rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court;

In accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure, conduct extradition proceedings, initial appearances and preliminary examinations for persons charged with felonies;

Arraign, try, and sentence defendants in criminal cases amounting to misdemeanors for which the punishment prescribed by law does not exceed imprisonment for more than one (1) year, regardless of the amount of the fine that may be imposed. In relation to such misdemeanors, this includes the power to accept plea agreements, order the examination of a defendant who enters a plea of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency or not triable by reason of mental illness or deficiency, order presentence investigations, order substance abuse evaluations, order and conduct pretrial conferences, enter orders for sentencing, impose sentence, impose terms of probation, issue orders to show cause, conduct show cause hearings and enter such other orders as a circuit judge may enter in chambers when the circuit judge is unavailable, when the judge has recused himself from the case or when the judge has been peremptorily disqualified from hearing a case. In criminal cases where a full-time magistrate may sentence a defendant to imprisonment for not more than one (1) year and the law authorizes imposition of a term of probation that exceeds the maximum term of incarceration established for the offense, the magistrate may sentence the defendant to probation as authorized by such law;

Correct an illegal sentence imposed in a criminal case or reduce a sentence at any time;

Preserve and enforce order in his immediate presence and in the proceedings before him; and

Hear and issue orders in peace bond, stalking and domestic violence cases under Wyoming statutes, title 7, chapter 3 and title 35, chapter 21.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2005, ch. 189, § 1; 2009, ch. 39, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” for “three thousand dollars ($3,000.00)” in (c)(x).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (c)(xviii) to expand the sentencing authority of full-time magistrates who are not authorized to practice law in the state as specified; added (c)(xxi); and made related changes.

§ 5-9-209.
Full-time magistrates; salary.

A full-time magistrate
of the circuit court shall receive an annual salary and benefits as
determined by the legislature. The salary and benefits shall be paid
by the state in equal monthly allotments.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 5-9-210.
Part-time magistrates; selection.

In a county receiving the services of a circuit court and whether or not a circuit court judge resides in the county, there may be one (1) or more part-time magistrates each of whom shall meet the qualifications under W.S.

5-9-201

and each shall be appointed as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

If a circuit court judge finds the public interest requires a magistrate for any county within that judge’s circuit irrespective of where the circuit court judge resides, then the circuit judge shall submit the name of the person for approval or rejection to the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the magistrate will serve. Upon approval by the board, the circuit court shall appoint the part-time magistrate as provided in W.S

5-9-202

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 5-9-211.
Part-time magistrates; tenure.

Each part-time magistrate
appointed under W.S.

5-9-202

shall serve continuously and solely at the pleasure of
the appointing circuit court judge.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 5-9-212.
Part-time
magistrates; powers.

At the direction of the circuit judges of a circuit or the supreme court, a part-time magistrate of the circuit court shall have the powers in respect to every suit or proceeding pending in the circuit court of the county for which he was appointed as follows:

Administer an oath or affirmation authorized or required by law to be administered;

Take acknowledgment of deeds, mortgages and other instruments in writing;

Perform marriage ceremonies;

Issue subpoenas for witnesses, and coerce their attendance in causes or matters pending before them, or other cause or matter wherein they may be required to take depositions;

Try the action for forcible entry and detainer, as set forth in W.S.

1-21-1001

through

1-21-1016

;

Proceed against sureties for costs and amount of bail, on the stay of execution on their dockets;

Enter the following judgments, when the amount does not exceed the magistrate’s jurisdiction:

Judgment by default;

Summary judgment;

Judgment on the pleadings;

Judgment on the confession of a party;

Set aside default judgments; and

Issue any order a circuit judge can enter in chambers.

Try an action for disposition of an abandoned vehicle as provided by W.S. 31-13-112(e), regardless of the value of the abandoned vehicle;

Issue warrants, including search warrants and arrest warrants, or summonses in criminal cases in accordance with the rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court. A warrant or summons issued by the magistrate charging any crime may be executed or served at any place within the state;

Set bail in criminal proceedings, including bail for witnesses, in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 5-9-132(a) and the rules promulgated by the Wyoming supreme court;

In accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure, conduct extradition proceedings, initial appearances and preliminary examinations for persons charged with felonies;

Preserve and enforce order in his immediate presence and in the proceedings before him;

Hear and issue orders in peace bond, stalking and domestic violence cases under Wyoming Statutes title 7, chapter 20 and title 35, chapter 21;

Conduct small claims trials;

In misdemeanor cases, to conduct arraignments, accept plea agreements, order the examination of a defendant who enters a plea of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency or not triable by reason of mental illness or deficiency, order presentence investigations, order substance abuse evaluations, order and conduct pretrial conferences, enter orders for sentencing, impose sentence, impose terms of probation, issue orders to show cause, conduct show cause hearings, and enter such other orders as a circuit judge may enter in chambers when the circuit judge is unavailable, when the judge has recused himself from a case or when the judge has been peremptorily disqualified from hearing a case.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and upon request and consent of all parties to a proceeding or case in circuit court and subject to the approval of the circuit judge presiding in the proceeding or case, a part-time magistrate who is authorized to practice law in Wyoming may hear and determine any and all matters relating to the proceeding or case that are within the jurisdiction of the circuit court, except the magistrate shall not preside in or hear or decide any district court proceeding or case in circuit court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-3-112

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2009 amendment

substituted “chapter 20” for “chapter 3” in (a)(xiii).

Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2009.

Cited in

Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 5-9-213.
Part-time magistrates; pay.

A part-time magistrate
of the circuit court shall be paid by the state. A claim for compensation
under this section shall be made by voucher, verified under oath,
setting forth in detail the services performed, time expended and
amount of compensation claimed. No claim for compensation under this
section shall be paid unless approved and allowed by a judge of the
circuit court.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 164, § 1.

§ 5-9-214.
Circuit court to review orders; approval or disapproval.

The circuit court shall
at each term review and approve or disapprove, reverse or modify orders
made by, and proceedings had before, magistrates in proceedings under W.S. 5-9-208(c)(v), (vii) through (ix), (xiii)(F) and (xvii) and 5-9-212(a)(v),
(vii), (xi) and (xiii) through (xv).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1.